Mississippi, session 2026, SB2266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The segment of U.S. Highway 98 located in Greene County, Mississippi, commencing at the Chickasawhay River Bridge and extending north for approximately one (1) mile, is designated and shall be known as the "Michael Robbins Memorial Highway." (2)  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs along and approaching the segment of highway described in subsection (1) of this section. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.